California, session 20252026, AB1587.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4064 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4064. (a) A prescription for a dangerous drug or dangerous device may be refilled without the prescriber’s authorization if the prescriber is unavailable to authorize the refill and if, in the pharmacist’s professional judgment, failure to refill the prescription might interrupt the patient’s ongoing care and have a significant adverse effect on the patient’s well-being.(b) The pharmacist shall inform the patient that the prescription was refilled pursuant to this section.(c) The pharmacist shall inform the prescriber within a reasonable period of time of any refills dispensed pursuant to this section, if a prescriber is identified.(d) The prescriber shall not incur any liability as the result of a refilling of a prescription pursuant to this section.(e) Notwithstanding Section 4060 or any other law, a person may possess a dangerous drug or dangerous device furnished without prescription pursuant to this section.